Washington statutes.
RCW 17.21.350

Report to legislature.

By February 1st of each year the department shall report to the appropriate committees of the house of representatives and the senate on the activities of the department under this chapter. The report shall include, at a minimum: (1) A review of the department's pesticide incident investigation and enforcement activities, with the number of cases investigated and the number and amount of civil penalties assessed; and (2) a summary of the pesticide residue food monitoring program with information on the food samples tested and results of the tests, a listing of the pesticides for which testing is done, and other pertinent information.

[ 1997 c 242 s 19; 1989 c 380 s 64.]